Utah statutes.
34A-2-903.   Failure to be tested -- Time limit for death benefits.

(1)  An emergency medical services provider who refuses or fails to be tested in accordance with Section 34A-2-901 is not entitled to any of the presumptions provided by this part.

(2)  Death benefits payable under Section 34A-2-702 are payable only if it can be established by competent evidence that death was a consequence of or result of the disease and, notwithstanding Subsection 34A-2-702(5), that death occurred within six years from the date the employee first acquired a disability or required medical treatment for the disease that caused the employee's death.



Amended by Chapter 366, 2011 General Session

